src/noun-mdf-morph.txt
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!! ADJECTIVES !!
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON AdjTag
#;


LEXICON GenTag
#;

!!!!!!!!!!!
!! NOUNS !!
!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON NTag
#;

LEXICON N-ava
 N-kal ;

LEXICON N-ofta
:%>О2 N-ava ;
 N-kal ;

LEXICON N-pinge
:%>О2 N-ava ;
 N-kal ;

LEXICON N-pula
:%>О2 N-ava ;

LEXICON N-osh
 N-kal ;

LEXICON N-kal
!! Indefinite
+N+Sg+Nom+Indef: K ;
+N+Pl+Nom+Indef:%>Х1т K ;
+N+Sg+Gen+Indef:%>О1нь K ;
+N+Pl+Gen+Indef:%>О1нь K ;
+N+Sg+Dat+Indef:%>О1нди K ;
+N+Pl+Dat+Indef:%>О1нди K ;
+N+Sg+Abl:%>дО1 Choose-INDEF-OBLPX-kal ;
+N+Pl+Abl:%>дО1 Choose-INDEF-OBLPX-kal ;
+N+Sg+Ill+Indef:%>с K ;
+N+Pl+Ill+Indef:%>с K ;
+N+Sg+Ill:%>з OBLIQUECX-PX-osh ; 
+N+Pl+Ill:%>з OBLIQUECX-PX-osh ;
+N+Sg+Ine:%>сО1 Choose-INDEF-OBLPX-kal ;
+N+Pl+Ine:%>сО1 Choose-INDEF-OBLPX-kal ;
+N+Sg+Ela:%>стО1 Choose-INDEF-OBLPX-kal ;
+N+Pl+Ela:%>стО1 Choose-INDEF-OBLPX-kal ;
+N+Sg+Abe:%>фтомО1 Choose-INDEF-OBLPX-kal ;
+N+Pl+Abe:%>фтомО1 Choose-INDEF-OBLPX-kal ;
+N+Sg+Tra+Indef:%>кс K ;
+N+Pl+Tra+Indef:%>кс K ;
+N+Sg+Comp:%>шка Choose-INDEF-OBLPX-kal ;
+N+Pl+Comp:%>шка Choose-INDEF-OBLPX-kal ;
+N+Sg+Prl:%>Г2а Choose-INDEF-OBLPX-kal ;
+N+Pl+Prl:%>Г2а Choose-INDEF-OBLPX-kal ;

!! Definite Sg
+N+Sg+Nom+Def:%>сь K ;
+N+Sg+Gen+Def:%>ть K ;
+N+Sg+Dat+Def:%>ти K ;

!! Definite Pl

 PLDEFCX ;

!! Possessor Indices
+N: PX1SG ;
+N: PX2SG ;
+N: PX3SG ;
+N: PX1PL ;
+N: PX2PL ;
+N: PX3PL ;

LEXICON PLDEFCX
+N+Pl+Nom+Def:%>Х1тне K ;
+N+Pl+Gen+Def:%>Х1тне%>О1нь K ;
+N+Pl+Dat+Def:%>Х1тне%>О1нди K ;


LEXICON PX1SG
+Sg+Nom+Px1Sg:%>О1зе K ;
+Sg+Gen+Px1Sg:%>О1зе%>О1нь K ;
+Sg+Dat+Px1Sg:%>О1зе%>О1нди K ;
+Sg+Dat+Px1Sg:%>О1з%>ти K ;

+Pl+Nom+Px1Sg:%>не K ;
+Pl+Gen+Px1Sg:%>не%>О1нь K ;
+Pl+Dat+Px1Sg:%>не%>О1нди K ;

LEXICON PX2SG
+Sg+Nom+Px2Sg:%>це K ;
+Sg+Gen+Px2Sg:%>це%>О1нь K ;
+Sg+Dat+Px2Sg:%>це%>О1нди K ;

+Pl+Nom+Px2Sg:%>тне K ;
+Pl+Gen+Px2Sg:%>тне%>О1нь K ;
+Pl+Dat+Px2Sg:%>тне%>О1нди K ;

LEXICON PX3SG
+Sg+Nom+Px3Sg:%>О1ц K ;
+Sg+Gen+Px3Sg:%>О1нц K ;
+Sg+Dat+Px3Sg:%>О1нцты K ;

+Pl+Nom+Px3Sg:%>О1нзО1 K ;
+Pl+Gen+Px3Sg:%>О1нзО1%>О1н K ;
+Pl+Dat+Px3Sg:%>О1нзО1%>О1нды K ;

!!
LEXICON PX1PL
+Sg+Nom+Px1Pl:%>О1ньке K ;
+Sg+Gen+Px1Pl:%>О1ньке%>О1нь K ;
+Sg+Dat+Px1Pl:%>О1ньке%>О1нди K ;

+Pl+Nom+Px1Pl:%>О1ньке K ;
+Pl+Gen+Px1Pl:%>О1ньке%>О1нь K ;
+Pl+Dat+Px1Pl:%>О1ньке%>О1нди K ;

LEXICON PX2PL
+Sg+Nom+Px2Pl:%>О1нте K ;
+Sg+Gen+Px2Pl:%>О1нте%>О1нь K ;
+Sg+Dat+Px2Pl:%>О1нте%>О1нди K ;

+Pl+Nom+Px2Pl:%>О1нте K ;
+Pl+Gen+Px2Pl:%>О1нте%>О1нь K ;
+Pl+Dat+Px2Pl:%>О1нте%>О1нди K ;

LEXICON PX3PL
+Sg+Nom+Px3Pl:%>снО1 K ;
+Sg+Gen+Px3Pl:%>снО1%>О1н K ;
+Sg+Dat+Px3Pl:%>снО1%>О1нды K ;

+Pl+Nom+Px3Pl:%>снО1 K ;
+Pl+Gen+Px3Pl:%>снО1%>О1н K ;
+Pl+Dat+Px3Pl:%>снО1%>О1нды K ;

!!
LEXICON Choose-INDEF-OBLPX-kal
+Indef: K ;
 OBLIQUECX-PX-kal ;

LEXICON OBLIQUECX-PX-kal
+Px1Sg:%>О1н K ;
+Px2Sg:%>т K ;
+Px3Sg:%>О1нзО1 K ;
+Px1Pl:%>О1нк K ;
+Px2Pl:%>О1нт K ;
+Px3Pl:%>ст K ;

LEXICON Choose-INDEF-OBLPX-osh
+Indef: K ;
 OBLIQUECX-PX-osh ;

LEXICON OBLIQUECX-PX-osh
+Px1Sg:%>О1н K ;
+Px2Sg:%>т K ;
+Px3Sg:%>О1нзО1 K ;
+Px1Pl:%>О1нк K ;
+Px2Pl:%>О1нт K ;
+Px3Pl:%>О1ст K ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!! PROPER NOUNS !!
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
LEXICON PROP
#;


LEXICON ACRONDELIMITER ! Here we need some kind of vowel harmony
    PROP ;
:%: PROP ;
:%- PROP ;
:%' PROP ;
